Idaho statutes. Title 65 SERVICE MEMBERS — VETERANS — SPOUSES AND DEPENDENTS
Chapter 7
IDAHO VETERANS RECOGNITION ACT

Sec.

§ 65-701. Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a program to recognize the service of Idaho veterans. This chapter is intended to support programs or organizations that serve veterans.

§ 65-702. Idaho veterans recognition fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the “Idaho veterans recognition fund.” The state treasurer is hereby granted the authority to invest the assets of the fund in any investment instruments authorized by the standards of the Idaho uniform prudent investor act, chapter 5, title 68, Idaho Code.

The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated from excess earnings from funds maintained by the division of veterans services and shall maintain its interest and investment earnings generated by such moneys in the fund.

Money in the fund shall be used solely to benefit veterans in Idaho, with priority given to activities that serve disabled veterans, and may include the use of matching funds for grants, funding for new construction, replacement, remodel, and life safety projects for the Idaho state veterans homes, state veterans cemeteries, and other available federal grant opportunities that enhance veterans services in the state of Idaho.

§ 65-703. Distributions from the Idaho veterans recognition fund.

On the first business day of each July, or as necessary, the administrator of the division of veterans services, as directed by the Idaho veterans recognition committee, shall request the state controller to make a transfer or transfers to the Idaho veterans recognition income fund.

As necessary, the administrator of the division of veterans services shall be authorized to request the state controller to make a transfer or transfers from the Idaho veterans recognition fund to the Idaho veterans recognition income fund to provide for matching grant funds and to provide funding for new construction, replacement, remodel, and life safety projects for the Idaho state veterans homes, state veterans cemeteries, and other available federal grant opportunities to enhance veterans services in the state of Idaho.

§ 65-704. Idaho veterans recognition income fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the “Idaho veterans recognition income fund.”

The fund shall consist of moneys transferred from the Idaho veterans recognition fund, and interest generated by such moneys in the fund shall be maintained by the division of veterans services.

The fund shall be used solely to benefit veterans in Idaho, with priority given to activities that serve disabled veterans, and may include the use of matching funds for grants, funding for new construction, replacement, remodel, and life safety projects for the Idaho state veterans homes, state veterans cemeteries, and other available federal grant opportunities that enhance veterans services in the state of Idaho.

Moneys in the Idaho veterans recognition income fund are subject to appropriation by the legislature.

Any fiscal year-end revenue in the division of veterans services budget in excess of the equivalent of the first six (6) months of the fiscal year operation costs may be transferred to the Idaho veterans recognition fund as determined by the division of veterans services.

§ 65-705. Committee to prepare and recommend allocation plan.

A committee consisting of seven (7) members, herein referred to as the Idaho veterans recognition committee, shall annually prepare a recommendation to the governor and the legislature on how to spend the available funds in the Idaho veterans recognition income fund. Committee members shall include the five members of the Idaho veterans affairs commission and two additional members to be appointed by the governor. At least one (1) of the members shall have served in a recent war or conflict engaged in by the government of the United States and at least one (1) member shall be a disabled veteran. For purposes of the appointment to the committee, a disabled veteran shall have a current service-connected disability of thirty percent (30%) or more.

The committee shall:

Maintain a familiarity with the needs of veterans returning from armed service;

Establish priorities for use of moneys in the Idaho veterans recognition income fund; and

Make a recommendation each year to the governor and legislature on use of moneys in the Idaho veterans recognition income fund in the form of an annual allocation plan.

§ 65-706. Annual allocation plan.

The annual allocation plan shall include, at a minimum:

A discussion of the previous year’s budget, expenditure amounts, use of funds and program outcomes;

A progress update for current year activities;

A recommendation for the following year, including expected budget, proposed use of funds and timeline of expenditures; and

Identification of additional needs of Idaho veterans that resources within the fund are inadequate to address.

In preparation of the plan, the committee shall solicit public comment in a public meeting.

The committee shall submit the annual allocation plan to the administrator of the division of veterans services by August 1, or as soon thereafter as possible, each year.

In addition to the requirements of chapter 35, title 67, Idaho Code, the division of veterans services shall include the annual allocation plan in its annual budget request.